Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB151.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 48 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "illegal alien" means any foreign national who is
unlawfully present in the United States pursuant to 8 U.S.C. sec. 1325.
(2) State tax dollars appropriated by the General Assembly shall not be used to
compensate an illegal alien for any goods or services sold, provided, or performed
by him or her to or for any governmental entity or other person.
(3) The Kentucky Office of Homeland Security shall assist in the implementation and
enforcement of this section, and may promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A as necessary.
Page 1 of 1
BR144700.100 - 1447 - XXXX 2/28/2025 10:41 AM Jacketed